North Carolina, session 2025, HB1206.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Effective January 1, 2027, Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new Article to read:
"Article 24.
"Pregnant Workers Fairness Act.
"§95-280. Title.
This Article shall be known and may be cited as the "North Carolina Pregnant Workers
Fairness Act."
"§ 95-281. Definitions
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Covered entity. – Each of the following:
a. A private employer engaged in an industry affecting commerce who
employs 15 or more employees.
b. The executive, judicial, and legislative branches of State government.
c. A unit of local government, including a county, city, or town.
(2) Employee. – Any individual employed by a covered entity, including an
applicant for employment.
(3) Known limitation. – Any physical or mental condition related to, affected by,
or arising out of pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions that the
employee or the employee's representative has communicated to the covered
entity, regardless of whether that condition meets the definition of disability
under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12102.
(4) Qualified employee. – An employee or applicant who, with or without
reasonable accommodation, can perform the essential functions of the
employment position. An employee or applicant is also qualified if any
inability to perform an essential function is for a temporary period, the
essential function could be performed in the near future, and the inability to
perform that function can be reasonably accommodated.
(5) Reasonable accommodation and undue hardship. – As defined in Section 101
of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12111, and
*H1206-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
interpreted consistent with that Act and the regulations promulgated
thereunder, including the interactive process for identifying and implementing
an appropriate accommodation. Rules adopted by the Commissioner under
G.S. 95-285 shall be consistent with this definition and shall not be construed
to limit rights afforded under this Article.
"§ 95-282. Unlawful employment practices.
It is an unlawful employment practice for any covered entity to do any of the following:
(1) Fail or refuse to make reasonable accommodations to the known limitations
of a qualified employee related to pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical
conditions, unless the covered entity demonstrates that the accommodation
would impose an undue hardship on the operation of its business.
(2) Impose an accommodation upon a qualified employee for a known limitation
related to pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions without first
engaging in the interactive process with that employee to identify an effective
accommodation.
(3) Require a qualified employee to accept a particular accommodation for a
known limitation related to pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical
conditions where an alternative accommodation identified through the
interactive process would be equally effective and would not impose an undue
hardship on the covered entity.
(4) Deny employment opportunities to a qualified employee where the denial is
based on the need to make reasonable accommodations to that employee's
known limitations related to pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical
conditions.
(5) Require a qualified employee to take leave, whether paid or unpaid, where
another reasonable accommodation can be provided to address that
employee's known limitations related to pregnancy, childbirth, or related
medical conditions.
(6) Take any adverse action in the terms, conditions, or privileges of employment
against a qualified employee on account of that employee's request for or use
of a reasonable accommodation for known limitations related to pregnancy,
childbirth, or related medical conditions.
"§ 95-283. Retaliation and coercion prohibited.
(a) Nondiscrimination. – No covered entity or other person shall discriminate against any
employee because that employee has opposed any act or practice made unlawful under this
Article, or because that employee made a charge, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner
in an investigation, proceeding, or hearing under this Article.
(b) No Intimidation. – No covered entity or other person shall coerce, intimidate,
threaten, or interfere with any individual in the exercise or enjoyment of any right granted or
protected by this Article, or on account of that individual having exercised or enjoyed such a
right, or having aided or encouraged any other individual in doing so.
(c) Remedies. – The remedies and procedures available under G.S. 95-284 apply to
violations of this section.
"§ 95-284. Enforcement and remedies.
(a) Private right of action. – Any employee aggrieved by a violation of this Article may
bring a civil action in the Superior Court of the county where the violation occurred, where the
covered entity maintains its principal place of business, or where the employee resides.
(b) Exhaustion. – Before filing a civil action under this section, an aggrieved State
employee shall first exhaust any applicable State Human Resources Commission, or other
grievance procedures, before filing suit.
Page 2 House Bill 1206-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Remedies. In any civil action brought under this Article, the court may award the
following:
(1) Injunctive relief, including reinstatement and reasonable accommodation.
(2) Back pay and lost benefits.
(3) Compensatory damages for future pecuniary losses, emotional pain and
suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, and loss of enjoyment of life.
(4) Punitive damages, where the covered entity engaged in an unlawful
employment practice with malice or with reckless indifference to the rights of
the aggrieved employee.
(5) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff.
(d) Damages limitation. – Compensatory and punitive damages may not be awarded
under this section where the unlawful employment practice involves the provision of a reasonable
accommodation and the covered entity demonstrates that it made good-faith efforts, in
consultation with the affected employee, to identify and provide a reasonable accommodation
that would offer an equally effective opportunity and would not cause undue hardship on the
operation of the covered entity.
(e) State employees. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive the State's
sovereign immunity beyond the extent expressly provided herein. An employee of the State or
any of its agencies, institutions, or subdivisions may bring a civil action under this Article in
State Superior Court, and the State shall not assert sovereign immunity as a defense to such an
action.
(f) Statute of limitations. – An aggrieved employee must bring a civil action under this
Article within three years after the date the unlawful employment practice occurred. For a State
employee required to exhaust State Human Resources Commission grievance procedures under
subsection (b) of this section, the three-year period is tolled from the date the employee initiates
those grievance procedures until the date a final decision is issued or the procedures are otherwise
concluded.
"§ 95-285. Rulemaking; policies.
(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the Commissioner of Labor
shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes to carry out the
purposes of this Article. The rules shall include examples of reasonable accommodations
addressing known limitations related to pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical conditions,
and shall be issued in an accessible format.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section:
(1) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall adopt policies to implement the
provisions of this Article for the judicial branch.
(2) The Legislative Service Officer shall adopt policies to implement the
provisions of this Article for the legislative branch.
"§ 95-286. Relationship to other laws.
Nothing in this Article limits or supersedes any right, remedy, or protection provided under
any other provision of State or federal law that affords equal or greater protection to individuals
affected by pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions. The protections of this Article
are cumulative with and in addition to those provided under Article 49A of Chapter 143 of the
General Statutes and any applicable federal law.
"§ 95-287. Severability.
If any provision of this Article or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid
or unconstitutional, the remainder of the Article and the application of that provision to other
persons or circumstances are unaffected."
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund
the sum of six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated
as follows for implementation of this act:
House Bill 1206-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to the Department of Labor.
(2) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to the Administrative Office of the
Courts for the judicial branch,
(3) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to the Legislative Services Office
for the legislative branch.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 4 House Bill 1206-First Edition